California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 120) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 89.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.

(a) “Medically needy person” means any of the following:

(1) An aged, blind, or disabled person who meets the definition of aged, blind, or disabled under the Supplemental Security Income program and whose income is insufficient to provide for the costs of health care or coverage.

(2) A child in foster care for whom public agencies are assuming financial responsibility, in whole or in part, or a person receiving aid under Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4.

(3) A child who is eligible to receive Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to interstate agreements for adoption assistance and related services and benefits entered into
 under Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 16170) of Part 4, to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(b) “Medically needy family person” means a parent or caretaker relative of a child or a child under 21 years of age or a pregnant woman of any age with a confirmed pregnancy, exclusive of those persons specified in subdivision (a), whose income is insufficient to provide for the costs of health care or coverage.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 121) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 90.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 89 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.5.

(a) “Medically needy person” also means any person who receives in-home supportive services pursuant to Section 12305.5 and whose income and resources are insufficient to provide for the costs of health care or coverage.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 122) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 91.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.5.

(a) “Medically needy person” also means any person who receives in-home supportive services pursuant to Section 12305.5 and whose income is insufficient to provide for the costs of health care or coverage.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 123) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 92.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 91 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.7.

“Post-eligibility treatment of income” means the determination of long-term care patient liability for each month in which the patient is described in Section 14050.3 or as an institutionalized spouse described in Section 14002.5 determined in accordance with Section 435.725 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, without regard to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of that section, and Sections 435.832, and 435.845 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 124.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.8.

“Long-term care patient liability” is the term given to the result of the post-eligibility treatment of income calculation under Section 14051.7. The person in long-term care or an institutionalized spouse shall incur or expect to incur an amount of medical expenses that equal this amount pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14005.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 125.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14052.

“State-only Medi-Cal person” means a person who resides in a nursing facility or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled, and who meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Could not meet the definition of a categorically needy person under Section 14050.1, a medically needy person under subdivision (a) of Section 14051 or a medically needy family person under subdivision (b) of Section 14051.

(b) Is over 21 years of age.

(c) Meets the eligibility requirements of Section 14005.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 15.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14052.1.

“Cuban-Haitian entrant or refugee” means a person eligible under the Cuban-Haitian Entrant Program or Refugee Resettlement Program, as defined in federal regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1354, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.

(a) The term “health care services” means the benefits set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14131) of this chapter and in Section 14021. The term includes inpatient hospital services for any individual under 21 years of age in an institution for mental diseases. Any individual under 21 years of age receiving inpatient psychiatric hospital services immediately preceding the date on which he or she attains age 21 may continue to receive these services until he or she attains age 22. The term also includes early and periodic
 screening, diagnosis, and treatment for any individual under 21 years of age.

(b) The term “health care services” does not include, except to the extent permitted by federal law, any of the following:

(1) Care or services for any individual who is an inmate of an institution (except as a patient in a medical institution).

(2) Care or services for any individual who has not attained 65 years of age and who is a patient in an institution for tuberculosis.

(3) Care or services for any individual who is 21 years of age or over, except as provided in the first paragraph of this section, and has not attained 65 years of age and who is a patient in an institution for mental disease.

(4) Inpatient
 services provided to individuals 21 to 64 years of age, inclusive, in an institution for mental diseases operating under a consolidated license with a general acute care hospital pursuant to Section 1250.8 of the Health and Safety Code, unless federal financial participation is available for such inpatient services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 64.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.1.

Notwithstanding Section 14053, ancillary outpatient services, pursuant to Section 14132, for any eligible individual who is 21 years of age or over, and has not attained 65 years of age and who is a patient in an institution for mental diseases shall be covered regardless of the availability of federal financial participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 38.   Effective August 10, 2001.   Note: Because the previously existing Section 14053.1 was repealed on July 1, 2001, Ch. 171, this section may have been added.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.3.

(a) Except as provided under federal law, federal financial participation reimbursement is not allowed for ancillary services provided to persons residing in facilities that have been found to be institutions for mental disease (IMD), and since, consistent with Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division 5 and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17600) of Part 5,
 counties are financially responsible for specialty mental health services and related ancillary services provided to persons through county mental health programs when Medi-Cal reimbursement is not available, when it is determined that Medi-Cal reimbursement has been paid for ancillary services for residents of IMDs, both the federal financial participation reimbursement and any state funds paid for the ancillary services provided to residents of IMDs shall be recovered from counties by the department in accordance with applicable state and federal statutes and regulations.

(b) Mental health plans shall report to the department admission and discharge dates for Medi-Cal beneficiaries in institutions for mental diseases on a quarterly basis in a format provided by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 225.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.5.

For the purposes of the Medi-Cal Act, the terms “prescribed drug” and “prescription drug” shall not include any drug which, because of differing prices charged by the manufacturer on a discriminatory basis or discriminatory refusal to sell by the manufacturer, or both, is not available on the same terms and conditions to all providers of prescription services, or any drug which is found to be overpriced in comparison to another drug which has an equivalent therapeutic effect, unless the director determines that the drug is vital to the program and no acceptable substitute is available.

Before the director determines that any drug has an equivalent therapeutic effect in comparison to another drug, or is vital to the program and no acceptable substitute is available, he must have received a report to that effect from the Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to quantity or other nondiscriminatory discounts available on the same terms and conditions to all providers of prescription services, to sales by competitive bidding to federal, state or local governmental agencies, or to sales to wholesalers so long as the manufacturer does not require or induce the wholesalers to make the drug available other than on the same terms and conditions to all providers of prescription services.

This section shall not be construed to deny reimbursement to hospitals for prescribed drugs furnished to inpatients or, unless the
 regulations provide to the contrary, to registered outpatients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 456, Sec. 11.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.6.

Prior to including or excluding any drug from the program, the director shall give adequate notice to those California associations of health professionals and those recognized national associations of pharmaceutical manufacturers that are affected by such action and shall seek and consider the advice of those associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available, the department may provide Medi-Cal eligibility and reimbursement for acute inpatient hospital services available under this chapter in accordance with Section 5072 of the Penal Code.

(b) The department may disenroll
 inmates made eligible for services under this section or in accordance with Section 5072 of the Penal Code from Medi-Cal managed care health plans, and may exempt inmates from enrollment into new or existing plans.

(c) Except as provided for in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be responsible for the nonfederal share of any reimbursement made for the provision of acute inpatient hospital services rendered to inmates who are eligible for and enrolled in a LIHP and receive services pursuant to this section and Section 5072 of the Penal Code.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including Section 11050, the department, as the single state agency, may make eligibility determinations and redeterminations for inmates in accord with this section and Section 5072 of the Penal Code.

(2) The department may enroll and disenroll inmates eligible for acute inpatient hospital services under this section or in accord with Section 5072 of the Penal Code in Medi-Cal or in the LIHP in which the inmate’s county of last legal residence participates.

(e) (1) In accordance with the requirements and conditions set forth under this section and Section 5072 of the Penal Code, the county may seek from the Medi-Cal program or from the responsible LIHP in which the county participates, reimbursement for the provision of inpatient hospital services to adults involuntarily detained or incarcerated in county facilities.

(2) (A) To the extent that a county seeks reimbursement for the provision of acute inpatient hospital services to adults who are involuntarily detained or
 incarcerated in county facilities and who are otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9, the county shall be responsible for the nonfederal share of the reimbursement.

(B) To the extent that a county seeks reimbursement for the provision of acute inpatient hospital services to adults who are involuntarily detained or incarcerated in county facilities and who are otherwise eligible for and enrolled in the LIHP in which the county participates, the LIHP shall be responsible for the nonfederal share of the reimbursement.

(f) Reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be limited to only those services for which federal financial participation pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act is allowed.

(g) This section shall be implemented only
 if and to the extent that existing levels of federal financial participation are not otherwise jeopardized. To the extent that the department determines that existing levels of federal financial participation are jeopardized, this section shall no longer be implemented.

(h) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained.

(i) This section shall have no force or effect if there is a final judicial determination made by any state or federal court that is not appealed, or by a court of appellate jurisdiction that is not further appealed, in any action by any party, or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that disallows, defers, or alters the implementation of
 this section or in accord with Section 5072 of the Penal Code, including the rate methodology or payment process established by the department that limits or affects the department’s authority to select the hospitals used to provide acute inpatient hospital services to inmates.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that the implementation of this section will result in state General Fund savings for the funding of acute inpatient hospital services provided to inmates and any related administrative costs.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may, without taking any further regulatory action, implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions.

(l) For purposes of this section, the following
 terms have the following meanings:

(1) The term “county of last legal residence” means the county in which the inmate resided at the time of arrest that resulted in conviction and incarceration in a state prison facility.

(2) The term “inmate” means an adult who is involuntarily residing in a state prison facility operated, administered or regulated, directly or indirectly, by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 82.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall develop a process to allow counties to receive any available federal financial participation for acute inpatient hospital services and inpatient psychiatric services provided to juvenile inmates who are admitted as inpatients in a medical institution off the grounds of the correctional facility, and who, but for their institutional status as inmates, are otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to this chapter. This process shall be coordinated, to the extent possible, with the processes and procedures established pursuant to Section 14053.7 of this code and Section 5072 of the Penal Code. This
 section
 shall not be construed to alter or abrogate any obligation of the state pursuant to an administrative action or a court order that is final and no longer subject to appeal to reimburse counties for any acute inpatient hospital services or inpatient psychiatric services provided to a juvenile inmate.

(b) A juvenile inmate who is an inpatient in a medical institution off the grounds of the correctional facility shall not be denied eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits under this section because of his or her institutional status as an inmate of a public institution.

(c) The department
 shall consult with counties in the development of the process pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall not be construed to limit the department’s authority to suspend or terminate Medi-Cal eligibility pursuant to Section 14011.10, except during such times that the juvenile inmate is receiving acute inpatient hospital services or inpatient psychiatric services pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that existing levels of federal financial participation are not otherwise jeopardized. To the extent that the department determines that existing levels of federal financial participation are jeopardized, this section shall no longer be implemented.

(f) The department shall seek any federal approvals necessary to implement the process developed pursuant to this
 section. This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, as part of the process developed pursuant to this section, the department may exempt juvenile inmates from enrollment into new or existing managed care health plans.

(h) The process developed pursuant to this section shall be implemented in only those counties that elect to provide the county’s pro rata portion of the nonfederal share of the state’s administrative costs associated with implementation of this section and the nonfederal share of expenditures for acute inpatient hospital
 services and inpatient psychiatric services provided to eligible juvenile inmates described in subdivision (a).

(i) (1) The federal financial participation received pursuant to the process implemented under this section shall be paid to the participating counties for services rendered to the juvenile inmates. If a federal audit disallowance and interest results from claims made under the process created pursuant to this section, the department shall recoup from the county that received the disallowed funds the amount of the disallowance and any applicable interest.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that implementation of this section will result in no increased cost to the state General Fund.

(j) (1) If there is a final judicial determination made by any state or federal court that is not appealed, or by a court of appellate jurisdiction that is not further appealed, in any action by any party, or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), that disallows, defers, or alters the implementation of this section or, to the extent applicable, Section 14053.7 of this code or Section 5072 of the Penal Code, including the rate methodology or payment process established by the department that limits or affects the department’s authority to select the facilities used to provide acute inpatient hospital services and inpatient psychiatric services to juvenile inmates, then any provision of
 this section that is inconsistent with the final judicial or CMS determination shall have no force or effect.

(2) In addition, the department may, at its discretion, cease to implement any other part of this section that is implicated by the final judicial or CMS determination.

(k) For the purposes of Medi-Cal eligibility pursuant to this section, “juvenile inmate” means an individual under 21 years of age who is involuntarily residing in a public institution, including state and local institutions.

(l) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may, without taking any further regulatory action, implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 836, Sec. 1.   (SB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall develop a process to allow the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, or any successor, to receive any available federal financial participation for acute inpatient hospital services and inpatient psychiatric services provided to any juvenile inmates in the Division of Juvenile Facilities who
 are admitted as inpatients in a medical institution off the grounds of the correctional facility, and who, but for their institutional status as juvenile inmates, are otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to this chapter. This process shall be coordinated, to the extent possible, with the processes and procedures established pursuant to Section 14053.7 of this code and Section 5072 of the Penal Code.

(b) Any juvenile inmate in the Division of Juvenile Facilities who is an inpatient in a medical institution off the grounds of the correctional facility shall not be denied eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits under this section because of his or her institutional status as an inmate in the Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(c) The department shall consult with the Division of Juvenile Facilities in the development of the process pursuant to this section.

(d) The department shall seek any federal approvals necessary to implement the process developed pursuant to this section. This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as part of the process developed pursuant to this section, the department may exempt any juvenile inmate in a facility operated by the Division of Juvenile Facilities from enrollment into new or existing managed care health plans.

(f) The process developed pursuant to this section shall be implemented only to the extent that the Division of Juvenile Facilities agrees voluntarily to provide the nonfederal share of any costs to the department associated with the
 administration of this section and the nonfederal share of expenditures for acute inpatient hospital services and inpatient psychiatric services provided off the grounds of the correctional facility to any juvenile inmate of the Division of Juvenile Facilities who is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to this section.

(g) The federal financial participation received pursuant to this section shall be paid to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for services rendered to any juvenile inmate in the Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(h) Reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be limited to only those services for which federal financial participation is available.

(i) (1) If there is a final judicial determination made by any state or federal court that is not appealed, or by a
 court of appellate jurisdiction that is not further appealed, in any action by any party, or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), that disallows, defers, or alters the implementation of this section or, to the extent applicable, Section 14053.7 of this code or Section 5072 of the Penal Code, including the rate methodology or payment process established by the department that limits or affects the department’s authority to select the facilities used to provide acute inpatient hospital services and inpatient psychiatric services to juvenile inmates in the Division of Juvenile Facilities, then any provision of this section that is inconsistent with the final judicial or CMS determination shall have no force or effect.

(2) In addition, the department may, at its discretion, cease to implement any other part of this section that is implicated by the final judicial or CMS
 determination.

(j) For the purposes of Medi-Cal eligibility pursuant to this section, “juvenile inmate” means an individual under 21 years of age who is involuntarily residing in a public institution, including state and local institutions.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may, without taking any further regulatory action, implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 212.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14054.

(a) “Share of cost” or “spend down of excess income” means the amount of the costs of health care that a person or family eligible under Section 14005.4 or 14005.7 shall incur prior to being
 certified by the department as specified in Section 14018.

(b) Upon the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, any reference to “share of cost” in this chapter or elsewhere in this code that relates to an individual Medi-Cal beneficiary’s or applicant’s eligibility under the medically needy persons or medically needy family persons categories shall be read as “spend down of excess income” and the definition in subdivision (a) shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 126.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14054.5.

“Elective services” means any treatment service which generally can be postponed without seriously affecting the health of the person requiring the service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

14055.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “caretaker relative” means a relative of a dependent child by blood, adoption, or marriage with whom the child is living, who assumes primary responsibility for the child’s care, and who is one of the following:

(1) The child’s father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother, sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, great grandparent, uncle, aunt, nephew, niece, great-great grandparent, great uncle or aunt, first cousin, great-great-great grandparent, great-great uncle or aunt, or first cousin once removed.

(2) The spouse or registered domestic partner of one of the relatives
 identified in paragraph (1), even after the marriage is terminated by death or divorce or the domestic partnership has been legally terminated.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 23.   (AB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14056.

“Minimum coverage” means prescribed drugs for public assistance recipients as established by the director, and care or coverage specified in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (10) of Section 14053, except that it shall not include elective services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

14057.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “insurance affordability program” means a program that is one of the following:

(1) The state’s Medi-Cal program under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(2) The state’s children’s health insurance program (CHIP) under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.).

(3) A program that makes available to qualified applicants coverage in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange, established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section
 100500) of the Government Code, with advance payment of the premium tax credit established under Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) A program that makes available coverage in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange, established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, with cost-sharing reductions established under Section 1402 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), and any subsequent amendments to that act.

(b) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 24.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative October 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14057.5.

“Contract hospital” means a nonprofit medical facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, with which the board of supervisors of a county which does not maintain a county hospital has executed a contract, currently in effect, to care for medically indigent individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

14059.

Health care provided under this chapter may include diagnostic, preventive, corrective, and curative services and supplies essential thereto, provided by qualified medical and related personnel for conditions that cause suffering, endanger life, result in illness or infirmity, interfere with capacity for normal activity including employment, or for conditions which may develop into some significant handicap.

Medical care shall include, but is not limited to, other remedial care, not necessarily medical. Other remedial care shall include, without being limited to, treatment by prayer or healing by spiritual means in the practice of
 the religion of any church or religious denomination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14059.5.

(a) For individuals 21 years of age or older, a service is “medically necessary” or a “medical necessity” when it is reasonable and necessary to protect life, to prevent significant illness or significant disability, or to alleviate severe pain.

(b) (1) For individuals under 21 years of age, a service is “medically necessary” or a “medical necessity” if the service meets the standards set forth in Section 1396d(r)(5) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) The department and its contractors shall update any model evidence of coverage documents, beneficiary handbooks, and related material to ensure the
 medical necessity standard for coverage for individuals under 21 years of age is accurately reflected in all materials.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, and make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan provider bulletins, manuals, plan contract amendments, or similar instructions until regulations are revised or adopted.

(4) By July 1, 2022, the department shall revise or adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This paragraph shall not apply to a Medi-Cal
 behavioral health delivery system, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101.

(c) This section shall not be construed to limit the application of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 51184 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) Medical necessity for covered benefits provided in a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101, shall also be governed in accordance with Section 14184.402.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 371.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14060.

Every recipient who is entitled to visual care under this chapter, which may be rendered either by an optometrist or a physician, may select a duly licensed member of either profession to render the service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14061.

As used in this chapter, “director” means the State Director of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14062.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14063.

As used in this chapter, “Medi-Cal” means the California Medical Assistance Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 577.)
-------------------------------------------

14064.

(a) Inpatient intensive rehabilitation hospital services shall consist of programs for:

(1) Strengthening and training of selected muscle groups.

(2) Preservation and restoration of joint mobility (prevention and correction of contractures).

(3) Training in application and use of equipment.

(4) Training in activities of daily living, self-care, locomotion and homemaking skills.

(5) Cognitive reorganization and communication skills.

(6) Resolution of psychological and social problems which are impeding rehabilitation.

(b) These programs shall use a multidiscipline approach carried out under the general or direct supervision of a physician with special training or experience in the field of rehabilitation. When medically indicated, a program of this scope includes but is not limited to:

(1) Skilled rehabilitation nursing care.

(2) Physical therapy.

(3) Occupational therapy.

(4) Speech therapy.

(5) Prosthetic or orthotic services.

(6) Psychologist services.

(7) Medical social worker services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 127.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14065.

As used in this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 14500), and Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 14520) of this part, the terms “Director of Health” and “Director of Benefit Payments” shall be construed to refer to and mean the State Director of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

14066.

As used in this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 14500), and Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 14520) of this part, the terms “Department of Health,” “State Department of Health,” “Department of Benefit Payments,” and “State Department of Benefit Payments” shall be construed to refer to and mean the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14064 (as added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252) by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

14067.

(a) The department, in conjunction with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, may develop and conduct a community outreach and education campaign to help families learn about, and apply for, Medi-Cal and the Healthy Families Program of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, subject to the requirements of federal law. In conducting this campaign, the department may seek input from, and contract
 with, various entities and programs that serve children, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Education, counties, Women, Infants, and Children program agencies, Head Start and Healthy Start programs, and community-based organizations that deal with potentially eligible families and children to assist in the outreach, education, and application completion process. The department shall implement the campaign if funding is provided for this purpose by an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

 (b) In implementing this section, the department may amend any existing or future media outreach campaign contract that it has entered into pursuant to Section 14148.5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any such contract entered into, or amended, as required to implement this section, shall be exempt from the approval of the Director of General Services and from the provisions of the Public Contract Code.

 (c) (1) The department, in conjunction with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, may award contracts to community-based organizations to help families learn about, and enroll in, the Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program, and other health care programs for low-income children. The department shall implement this subdivision if funding is provided for this purpose by an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

(2) Contracts for these outreach and enrollment projects shall be awarded based on, but not limited to, all of the following criteria:

(A) Capacity to reach populations or geographic areas with disproportionately low enrollment rates. If it is not possible to estimate the number of uninsured children in a geographic area who are eligible for the Medi-Cal program
 or the Healthy Families Program, proxy measures for rates of eligible children may be used. These measures may include, but are not limited to, the number of children in families with gross annual household incomes at or below the federal poverty levels pertinent to the programs.

(B) Organizational capacity and experience, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Organizational experience in serving low-income families.

(ii) Ability to work effectively with populations that have disproportionately low enrollment rates.

(iii) Organizational experiences in helping families learn about, and enroll in, the Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program. Organizations that do not have experience helping families learn about, and enroll in, the
 Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program shall be eligible only to the extent that they support and collaborate with the outreach and enrollment activities of entities with that experience.

(C) Effectiveness of the outreach and education plan, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Culturally and linguistically appropriate outreach and education strategies.

(ii) Strategies to identify and address barriers to enrollment, such as transportation limitations and community perceptions regarding the Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program.

(iii) Coordination with other outreach efforts in the community, including the statewide Healthy Families Program and Medi-Cal program outreach campaign, the state and federally funded county
 Medi-Cal outreach program, and any other Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program outreach projects in the target community.

(iv) Collaboration with other local organizations that serve families of eligible children.
